extensions/1013418_russian-english-dictionary/russian_english_dictionary-1.1/dictionaries/Russian-English_Bilingual.aff
SFX 168 Y 32
SFX 168 ький ький .
SFX 168 ький ького .
SFX 168 ький ькому .
SFX 168 ький ького .
SFX 168 ький ький .
SFX 168 ький ьким .
SFX 168 ький ьком .
SFX 168 ький ькая .
SFX 168 ький ькой .
SFX 168 ький ькой .
SFX 168 ький ькую .
SFX 168 ький ькой .
SFX 168 ький ькою .
SFX 168 ький ькой .
SFX 168 ький ькое .
SFX 168 ький ького .
SFX 168 ький ькому .
SFX 168 ький ькое .
SFX 168 ький ьким .
SFX 168 ький ьком .
SFX 168 ький ькие .
SFX 168 ький ьких .
SFX 168 ький ьким .
SFX 168 ький ьких .
SFX 168 ький ькие .
SFX 168 ький ькими .
SFX 168 ький ьких .
SFX 168 ький ек .
SFX 168 ький ька .
SFX 168 ький ько .
SFX 168 ький ьки .
SFX 168 ький ующейся .

SFX 169 Y 32
SFX 169 ький ький .
SFX 169 ький ького .
SFX 169 ький ькому .
SFX 169 ький ького .
SFX 169 ький ький .
SFX 169 ький ьким .
SFX 169 ький ьком .
SFX 169 ький ькая .
SFX 169 ький ькой .
SFX 169 ький ькой .
SFX 169 ький ькую .
SFX 169 ький ькой .
SFX 169 ький ькою .
SFX 169 ький ькой .
SFX 169 ький ькое .
SFX 169 ький ького .
SFX 169 ький ькому .
SFX 169 ький ькое .
SFX 169 ький ьким .
SFX 169 ький ьком .
SFX 169 ький ькие .
SFX 169 ький ьких .
SFX 169 ький ьким .
SFX 169 ький ьких .
SFX 169 ький ькие .
SFX 169 ький ькими .
SFX 169 ький ьких .
SFX 169 ький ек .
SFX 169 ький ька .
SFX 169 ький ько .
SFX 169 ький ьки .
SFX 169 ький ующейся .
